District of Columbia statutes.
8-111.06

Reprimands; suspensions; revocations.

The Mayor may reprimand an asbestos worker or business entity or suspend or revoke the license or permit of an asbestos worker or business entity, pursuant to § 2-509, if the asbestos worker or business entity:

(1)

Attempts to remove or encapsulate asbestos or material that contains asbestos without a license or permit required under this subchapter;

(2)

Fraudulently or deceptively obtains or attempts to obtain a license or permit;

(3)

Violates any provision of this subchapter or any rule promulgated pursuant to this subchapter; or

(4)

Fails to meet any applicable federal or District standard for asbestos abatement.

History

May 1, 1990, D.C. Law 8-116, § 7, 37 DCR 1641

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-991.6.